Utah statutes.
26-1-26.   Director of community health nursing appointed by executive director.

There shall be within the department a director of community health nursing appointed by the executive director who shall develop, implement, monitor, and evaluate community health nursing standards and services and participate in the formulation of policies for administration of health services.

